Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4713
Complaint system.

Every prepaid limited health service organization shall establish and maintain a complaint system to provide reasonable procedures for the resolution of written complaints initiated by enrollees or providers. This section shall not be construed to preclude an enrollee or a provider from filing a complaint with the director or as limiting the director's ability to investigate such complaints.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 13.